Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Attachment of Real Property

§ 3291.
Service of copies of attachment.

When real estate is attached, in addition to serving the party whose estate is attached, the officer shall leave a true and attested copy of the attachment, with a description of the estate so attached, in the office where by law a deed of that estate is required to be recorded.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 91, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3292.
Recording by town or Superior clerk.

When a copy of a writ of attachment, on which real estate is attached, is lodged in the office of a town or Superior clerk, such clerk shall enter in a book to be kept for that purpose the names of the parties, the date of the writ, the time when and the court to which the same is returnable, the nature of the action, the sum demanded, and the officer’s return thereon.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3293.
Discharge of attachment lien.

When an attachment or sequestration of real estate is made in an action at law, such real estate shall be discharged from such attachment lien and the party in whose favor the attachment or sequestration is made, his or her legal representative or attorney of record in the action shall discharge such attachment upon the record of attachment in the town clerk’s office, under any one of the following conditions:

when the action is discontinued or the demand on which it is founded is satisfied;

when the original writ or process is not returned to the court issuing the same within the time designated by such writ or process;

when final judgment is entered in such cause and the docket entries or court records of proceedings in such cause do not show that execution was issued therein within the time the attached property is held to respond to the judgment rendered thereon;

when execution has issued in such cause and returned with officer’s return thereon that the execution is satisfied; or

if such execution is not returned to the court issuing the same within two years from the date of issue as determined by the docket entries or court records, provided that service is not stayed by order or decree of any court or by operation of law.

If such attachment or sequestration is not discharged of record as above provided, any person having any title in or lien on such property may obtain from the court to which the original writ or process was made returnable, a certificate stating therein the fulfillment of any one of the conditions set forth above, and may file such certificate in the town or city clerk’s office in the town or city where such attachment was made. Such clerk shall thereupon discharge such attachment as follows:

“Discharged by the town (city) clerk per court’s certificate on file.”

[Repealed.]

A clerk discharging an attachment as herein authorized shall receive a fee of $4.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 84

, § 7, eff. July 1, 1971;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974;

1979, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1993, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 3294.
Liability for refusal to discharge attachment lien.

When such party or his or her representative refuses for 10 days after being thereto requested to discharge the lien so created, he or she shall be liable to the party injured for the damages occasioned thereby, to be recovered in an action of tort.

§ 3295.
Attachment of real estate and personal property.

A writ of attachment of real estate or personal property shall be filled out as provided by rule adopted by the Supreme Court and issued to the plaintiff’s attorney by the clerk of the court in the county where the action is pending or the property is located.
Such writ shall issue only upon the order of a Superior judge approving attachment in the same manner as is provided by the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure for attachment of personal property that is to be removed or taken into possession.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 19, 1978.